North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-14 Livestock Medicine [Repealed]

19-14-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 7, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 19-1401; S.L. 2003, ch. 185, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-14-02.
Registration of livestock medicine. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 7, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 19-1402; S.L. 1975, ch. 199, § 1; 1995, ch. 219, § 13; 1997, ch. 208, § 1; 2003, ch. 185, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-14-03.
Regulations for sale. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 7, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 19-1403; S.L. 1945, ch. 181, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 19-1403; S.L. 1985, ch. 258, § 37; 1995, ch. 54, § 11; 1995, ch. 219, § 14; 2003, ch. 185, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-14-04.
Registration fee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 7, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 19-1404; S.L. 1983, ch. 254, § 6; 1995, ch. 219, § 15; 1997, ch. 208, § 2; 2003, ch. 30, § 11; 2003, ch. 185, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-14-05.
Commissioner may cancel registration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 7, § 4, subs. 2; R.C. 1943, § 19-1405; S.L. 1995, ch. 219, § 16; 2003, ch. 185, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-14-06.
Commissioner may adopt rules, take testimony, grant public hearings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 7, § 4, subs. 3; R.C. 1943, § 19-1406; S.L. 1981, ch. 336, § 15; 1985, ch. 258, § 38; 1995, ch. 219, § 17; 2003, ch. 185, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-14-07.
Enforcement of chapter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 7, § 5, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 19-1407; 1995, ch. 219, § 18; 2003, ch. 185, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

19-14-08.
Penalty — Criminal — Civil. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 7, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 19-1408; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 185; 1985, ch. 258, § 39; 2003, ch. 185, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.